Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 166.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 166.2. A. Effective July 1, 1993, there is hereby
created the Commission for Rehabilitation Services, an agency of the
State of Oklahoma, a body corporate and politic, with powers of
government and with the authority to exercise the rights, privileges
and functions as herein specified, with its lawful operations deemed
to be an essential governmental function of the State of Oklahoma
with all the attributes thereof.
B. The Commission shall appoint and remove the Director of the
Department of Rehabilitation Services, approve programs, policy and
budget, and perform the necessary functions of a governing board for
the State Department of Rehabilitation Services.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2387 Page 1

C. l. The Commission shall consist of three (3) seven (7)
members, to be appointed by June 15, 1993, as follows:
a. one member two members shall be appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate for
a three-year term,
b. one member two members shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives for a
three-year term, and
c. one member three members shall be appointed by the
Governor for a three-year term.
2. Thereafter, beginning with the expiration of the terms of
the three members initially appointed, the Commission shall consist
of three (3) members, appointed as follows:
a. one member shall be appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate and shall serve a
term of one (1) year,
b. one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the
Oklahoma House of Representatives and shall serve a
term of two (2) years, and
c. one member shall be appointed by the Governor and
shall serve a term of three (3) years Except as
otherwise provided by this subsection, members shall
be appointed for terms of three (3) years. Each term

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2387 Page 2

shall begin on July 1 of the respective year and end
on June 30 three (3) years later.
3. The current appointee of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall serve until June 30, 2025. The current
appointee of the Governor shall serve until June 30, 2026. The
current appointee of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall
serve until June 30, 2027.
4. For the purpose of expanding the Commission to seven (7)
members, the following additional members shall be appointed:
a. one member shall be appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate for a term beginning on July 1,
2025 and ending on June 30, 2027,
b. two members shall be appointed by the Governor, each
for a term beginning on July 1, 2025 and ending on
June 30, 2026, and
c. one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives for a term beginning on July
1, 2025 and ending on June 30, 2028, in addition to
the member the Speaker shall appoint to fill the seat
of the current member whose term expires on June 30,
2025.
3. 5. Thereafter, at the expiration of the term, or termination
of the member's service for any reason, the original appointing

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2387 Page 3

auth ority shall appoint a successor for a term of three (3) years,
or for the remainder of an unexpired term.
D. Members of the Commission shall be knowledgeable of and have
concern for rehabilitation issues and disability issues; provided,
that such requirement shall not exclude participation of lay persons
as Commission members. All members shall be residents of the state
and qualified electors at the time of their appointment. Before
entering upon the duties of their office, members of the Commission
shall take the Constitutional oath of office and the same shall be
filed with the Secretary of State. A member of the Commission may
be reappointed to succeed himself or herself. Commission members
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance
of their duties as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
E. The original appointing authority may remove any
commissioner for misconduct, incompetency or neglect of duty, after
giving such commissioner a written statement of charges, and
opportunity for a hearing.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.






ENGR. H. B. NO. 2387 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 2387 Page 5